Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:(1) By July 1, 2027, hospitals shall publish all data and comply with all rules related to hospital price transparency pursuant to 45 C.F.R. Part 180, subparts A and B, as they existed on January 1, 2025.(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, hospitals shall submit the most recent machine-readable file containing a list of all standard charges for all hospital items or services and the most recent consumer-friendly list of standard charges for a limited set of shoppable services, as required in federal rule, to the department at least once a year.--- END ---